src/dictionaries/en_US.aff
PFX d Y 2
PFX d 0 खुश .
PFX d 0 बद .

PFX e Y 4
PFX e 0 सु .
PFX e 0 कु .
PFX e 0 सद् .
PFX e 0 स्व .

PFX f Y 1
PFX f 0 बे .

PFX g Y 1
PFX g 0 बा .

PFX h Y 1
PFX h 0 हर .

PFX i Y 1
PFX i 0 हम .

PFX j Y 1
PFX j 0 ना .

PFX k Y 1
PFX k 0 दर .

PFX l Y 1
PFX l 0 ऐन .

PFX m Y 1
PFX m 0 वि .

PFX n Y 2
PFX n 0 एक .
PFX n 0 बहु .

PFX ~ Y 1
PFX ~ 0 अशुभ .

PFX $ Y 1
PFX $ 0 शुभ .

PFX & Y 1
PFX & 0 अर्थ .

PFX ^ Y 1
PFX ^ 0 पाप .

PFX % Y 1
PFX % 0 प्रति .

PFX @ Y 1
PFX @ 0 अनु .

PFX ! Y 1
PFX ! 0 अति .

PFX ` Y 1
PFX ` 0 भू- .

PFX ( Y 1
PFX ( 0 कार्य .

PFX ) Y 1
PFX ) 0 पुनः .

PFX _ Y 1
PFX _ 0 नेत्र .

PFX - Y 1
PFX - 0 जीवन- .

PFX = Y 1
PFX = 0 अ .

PFX + Y 1
PFX + 0 आ .
