src/dictionaries/en_US.dic
धाराओं/`
क्रूरता/=!
वार्त्ता/=
वर्तनीय/%m+
बू/dg=+
शास्त्रियों/&
क्रय/=+m%
क्रमीय/m(
निर्धार्य/msT
शिक्षण/@M
मर्याद/f=
क्षेपण/m%!+
सङ्गी/-O
सङ्ग/=+
गर्हापूर्ण/m
स्थित/=sT
स्थापन/m%)@+
कर्त्ता/=(@
कर्त्ताओं/(
ख्याति/me%@=+
लम्बित/m@+
लम्बी/j
जयश्री/m
भिन्न/m=sT
भाग/@`=mM
भागी/=&m%
साँया/-
देवपूजा/n
प्राणित/@sT
प्रकृति/=m&
धर्मा/mnG
गम्य/e=+
प्रजनित/=
घोषण/mMF
कंपन/=+m@%
घूर्णित/%m+
बुद्ध/%m
स्वनिक/!E
रूढिवादी/=
तकल्लुफ़/fE
ज्ञानीराज/m
प्रवाहत/+@%
कर्मिता/m!
रोधित्र/%
मोनिया/h=
वाज़े/k
क़ायदगी/fg
खास्त/k
गाह/kLM
क्रियाहीन/%sT
केदार/jM
जोगिनी/m
मुरव्वत/fg
निश्चयात्मक/=sT
लिप्सा/&JKIC
ज्ञप्त/m@+
ख़्वास्त/kLM
ज्ञापन/m%@=+(
सँधान/@834sTvED
प्रलब्ध/mF
विस्फीति/%=
बंद/kME
श्ंअपर्क/`
अख़्तियार/f
खंडीय/nsT
प्रेषित/m%
प्लावित/m+
मानुषीय/=!
सूचियों/@
इन्साफ/fE
क्रमहीन/(@Ts
इस्तेमाली/j
भाषाविद/n
विशेषज्ञ/=sTM
मियान/kMFE
रवानी/g
रवाई/k
सिद्धिप्रद/(
म्यान/k
क्षिप्त/mM
वाज/kMF
नाश/^=mE
विरंजव्य/=
संधानशील/@
केंद्रण/m%
सूक्ष्मदर्शी/!
पथगामी/me=
स्मृत/m=sT
मार्गी/em
भेदकारी/m&
पर्यन्त/-
ध्रुवित/n
क्लोज/l
क्लेव/l
क्लोज़/l
भागीय/nm@
पारदृश्यत/=F
ग्राम/l%&
जीविका/+JK
केंद्राभिसरण/m
निर्धारितों/)
चक्रित/%=+
प्रवृत्तता/=(
गमनशील/%=+
भाज्य/msT
युक्त/+=sT
ईमान/fgE
सकता/+=G
बूदार/d
दर्शी/+%!(
दर्शिता/k
स्वनित्र/%
दस्ती/n
रक्षिणी/-
नाशक/msT
बारदार/k
देशी/+nm@
नाशशीलत/mF
नाशिनी/m^
इंतजामी/d
निहितन/m
रंजन/m@!M
तुलाई/)O
द्वेष/mME
विन्ध्य/%
पुनरावृत्तिशील/=
लार्ज/l
कांक्षणा/%!
पूर्त्य/+%
त्ववाद/nM
लक्षण/~=+%m@
लक्षणा/m$
सिलसिला/fg
गृहीत/=+%@
विधान/%&M
संतृप्त/n=
मौज़ूदगी/j
मर्ष/m+=M
संगिनी/-O
नरकचतुर्दशी/=
पाश्र्वीय/n
कामना/~=$m
कामनाओं/$
तृष्ण/!mDFM
विस्फीत/%
प्रयोग/m@M
प्लुति/m
ग्रह/+!m@%M
मुक्ति/m!^=+(
स्वीकृति/=^
यथार्थवाद/!ME
संकुलित/!
चिन्तक/$&
भेदन/mM
कम्पित/@=+
युक्ति/m&=
पत्ति/m+PQ
संख्यता/!=
पत्रक/%M
संक्षिप्तत/=F
चक्रिल/@=Ts
हिम्मत/fE
जीविता/%@!
परिवर्तन/+=&m!
स्वीकरण/^=
रूपण/=+m@%
रोज़गार/fgE
स्वीकार/^=
दिल/dfh+
दिली/nf
कर्मचारिता/!
संबंधी/-&
जैविक/%E
ज्ञाता/m%@&=+
उट/+
चिंतक/~=$&(m
चिंतन/~=$&(m@
रोधित/=%m@
रोधन/=+m@%
क्रियता/%=!@
क्रिया/m%@!=
क्रिय/=%TsF
खण्ड/=`
लासिनी/m
कम्प/=+`
काल/!m@-=$(
कास/mi=+
कृतत/=m@
कुशलता/=(
गामी/=+n!@%
घातक/=+m%
घ/g=EM
चरित/=+m-
चिंता/=&m@
क्षय/=^
गमता/e+
जन्य/^sT
गौरी/=jh
काश/m+%
जाति/=m%
जानि/=+
गोविंद/h
दिष्ट/=+!@
चर्य/+^
चर्या/=%_!@
बंधनीय/%
दक्षता/=(
नक/g+jM
नका/jf
ठा/nIC
तप्त/=+Ts
दत्त/=+m@%
लंघन/=!m
दीपक/=+m
दूषण/&mM
वर्त/+mME
वर्ती/=+%!m@
दर्द/iEM
धृति/=m
नायक/=m@%
यक/jsT
पिंड/_=E
शंभु/=
पाल/h@=%
लंभन/+
दायी/+m$
गोई/d
बीज/h=%
बाहु/=n%
हू/gR
मिति/=&@%
द्र/m+
पातन/+m@
रसन/=FD
ध्य/gm+
स्वर/=nm%
रति/m@=+(
र/kjg=+DEF
रोग/=+E
रें/kg=
राई/kg=+
रोगों/_!
बारों/k
मोह/mFE
योनि/=_
वन्य/=sT
राज़/jME
भास/+ME
वाचक/=m$
भोजी/+!
चुंबकता/%=@
युध/+M
प्रत्ति/%
वार/mi=+%
वाहक/=+(
वाहकों/(
शास्त्र/&`
रूढि/+
प्रतिवीर/=
रोहण/+m
साहसी/=!
सीर/jM
हस्त/=m%
सर/+vEFTs
वृत/m@=+%(
सर्ज/+h
सव/g+
सवा/f
वेश/k@=+%
सुति/+
परहेज़/d
नीयती/d
नुमाई/d
खंडत/=F
खून/jM
क़िस्मत/d
जौय/l
ड़/^njgf=+M
क्षम/(&=sT
मिजाज/d
ख्यातों/m+
स्फुलिंग/mFE
शगुनी/d
मिज़ाज/dE
कालिक/n=+!
पट्टी/_`
पक्षियों/%m
वृष्टि/m!=+
तरतीब/gf
कोशीय/n&
खबरी/df
मात्रिक/n
मात्र/=sTF
कलाप/(M
काट/@=+
कसन/mMFD
कामी/=~j!@$
सलूकी/d
लिंक/&
हवासी/df
मंज़ूर/jE
गिरी/=h
चलनी/d
दिहंद/j
इसबार/+
परायणों/&
चाली/e
जल/=m_M
बदान/j
सिंगार/hM
केंद्रक/nm
दर्शन/=+$m
पर्याप्त/=sTM
दन्त/nM
दिश/nm@%
गड़ी/f=
जेय/m=Ts
श्रुति/m%@=+
बालिग़/jM
निधिय/%M
भावुक/=!Ts
भीलों/j
स्वाद/+fM
कूँ/k
मौजूँ/j
बदर/k
पेच/k
याव/k
चित्रित/=m!@
तापी/=+@
वज़ा/k
तारा/nIC
दल/ngm=%(
तालों/h
ताली/fmh%
ताल/fmhE
दायिनी/$
स्पंदन/m%@+
पतन/!M
भूषितत/+F
लायक़/jE
दुखी/!
कल/g=mfF
इक/jg
क्षरण/=`m
उरु/j
परदा/kf
पालिका/(JK
नशीन/iE
चेत/m=FTs
च/jLMDEFv
चान/f=+
चूँ/jf
चेगा/jf
चेता/=^m
भाषीय/n
पोश/d
टो/jgm=+
टें/jg=+
टेंगी/j=+g
ध/fmDEFMTs
धन/mfgjF
धनी/!
धी/^jgfm+
थित/j
हाल/dfh
दंडित/=&
दंती/m$
बूद/j
ब/k=DEFM
आब/fE
बा/=hgkIC
रीश/jg
शित/jm=+
व्य/jh
साफ़/j
घराणक/+
शंकरी/h
पीके/l
वाज़िब/j
घर्षण/+m
पुजी/h
मय/^&m=+
ज़िला/i
निन्दा/%
व्यस्था/&
रूपीय/n+%
ईसवीं/g
घातित/+
मरण/@=+
संगी/+@-%
संगतत/m=F
सावेश/j
गुर/g
बिस्तर/iE
तिक/g
आँच/f
निन/gf
रुद/gm
रेक/g!m
लुई/g
लेय/gm
मज़ा/gf
हूँ/g
हों/jgh=+
होश/gf
वफ़ा/gf
देय-ऋण/%
कैद/f
रबी/j=
वर्ण/mn=sT
खौफ़/f
तरह/f
वक्त/lfih
मोड़/f
ज़ौक़/gf
लोच/f+
लौस/f
हड़/fF
बोला/h=IC
ख़बरी/df
ख़ुदा/jg
सदाचार/=E
वतन/iM
ज़ीक़/f
मौके/lf
बंधित/@%sT
गर्जित/@m
वत्ता/&
गति/!m@=+%
दरा/kICG
दरे/kf+
लिपि/%PQ
तालिका/hJK
श्रुत/n=+%m@
कृतिकार/+M
कंप/m@=+`
भक्षण/=^
वाची/=&@
दिवस/(M
जड़न/m
सरण/@mM
कौम/i
पवन/m@=
मति/m@=^
कोई/h
यूथ/m
कैन/h
केस/h
गिज़/h
वसन/m+
शय/!@m+
वहन/m=+%(
कंठिका/k
लोगों/i
लिया/=+f
ल/gf+DEFvTs
लूँ/gf
नफ़स/i
तेज/h=
दीक/h
दीप/h
सफर/i
निधिक/=%
सिंघा/fG
दम/fih=+
शक़ल/i
सफ़र/iM
याग/@
रगी/g
धैर्य/=M
इन्साफ़ी/j
ज़ात/i
क़ौम/i
वाह/mh(E
वाही/=&(mh
शाला/(JK
नयन/m+M
सूची/@kNO
स्थली/$
ज़ायका/dgf
समग्र/=sT
धूमित/+
ख़्वाह/d
भार/!=+M
लभ/e
प्रसर/=&
बद्घन/+@
मस्तु/=$
पाद/n=+
पीड़क/%sT
ध्यान/fE
वल्लभ/hM
पूर्य/+
रुप/n!mh@=+%
क्रमत/=%@
क्रम/=(!m@M
क्रमेण/@(
संधेय/+@
संवेदी/%=
कारी/+(~kjf!m@%
कारा/jG
कार/kfm+%E
कारें/k
भारग्रस्त/!sT
लीनों/m^
प्लुत/+m
रब्धि/+
वाई/l=(
कर्म/=^mMEF
कर्मी/=e%(m^
विद्ध/=+@Ts
शास्त्रत/&
मोदित/+@
क्रांत/m@!=+
विवरण/(M
हर्ता/=+%m@
सार/=@sT
सारी/!m@%
प्रेषण/m%)
सीमा/`K
लेपित/+m
लोक्य/+m^
लोक्यत/+
श्लेष/+&mM
हरण/m@=+%^
ण/kgh
लोड़ित/+mTs
सुन्दरता/!
सन्निकट/=sT
ध्न/m^
क्षेत्रफल/`
स्कंद/+EM
शमनी/^
वक्रोक्ति/&
पायदार/jE
कूल/%@sT
प्रयुत/@
रिक्त/=!Ts
नियुक्ति/)%m
धर्मपरायणता/!
कोशिक/nF
ख़याल/iE
ख़याली/fi
इज्जत/gf
योद्घा/%
ज़रूरी/f
प्रमुख/=sT
पंरपरा/@
मिक/j
लोक/m=+^`
ह्लादन/+
स्वर्ग/`M
सर्ग/mh%
आरआई/l
कोडर/l
वृद्धिक/=
स्वामी/`=
कूटोन/%
संकेतों/&
केंद्रीकृत/m
क्रमित/@!=+(
वेदन/+%M
माशी/d
रंजनीय/=+
शिंदे/g
खा/h734sTvBCI
ख/+hvMFD
खत/d+
गर/jgm=+
आबरु/gf
पुन/=
लक/njg=
पुश/+
सख/=hF
लार/=^
यानी/=k
यो/g=+
शन/kj=+
वल/jgf
वली/gh=+
इना/+IC
ऐच/l
ऐम/l
दंडी/n
दंड/=^&
वेला/~!%
जाना/h=IC
जनन/n=+%
जन/n_kgm=%
जूँ/h
जिए/h
जे/lkgh=+
जिएगा/hG
विजन/=
जीवी/+^!@
तरफ़ा/n
दक/@g
जोली/i
दार/jfmE
भाष/em+
मुखी/nm
विधीय/(
भक/j
ख़ू/d
अंदाज/f
ज़ो/j
ईर/g
भन/g
नाभ/!
आड/f
डी/ljgf
वल्य/nsT
सर्जनीय/m
जंघास्थि/@
स्वन/n!@%
फ/jgh=+
पूयिक/%
क़त/h
साया/iIC
हज़मी/d
बुनियाद/fg
चिकित्सक/_
वश्यक/=+
लेखचित्र/%
ज़ी/kjg
क्वेक/&
स्केट/gM
गुज़ारी/k
घड़ी/h$
उ/jg+
लचा/fIGC
दंडिन/nM
सुदेव/g
बद्घ/%@+sT
सहायत्व/=
चारिणी/n^
स्ंअपर्क/`
घरबार/fE
कल्प/m@M
शंसी/+$
पक्त्रिम/m
सुंदरता/=!
रक्षण/@+M
सामान्यत/=F
जुर्म/f
संरक्त/@
वान/km=&
सदनात्मक/n
कोटर/_
हीनतः/&(m^
गोलक/_
प्रदाह/_
यक्ष्मा/^
धब्बा/f
गर्भीय/`
निरूपण/&M
भ्रू/_
स्पर्द्धा/%G
जमानती/f
गुज़र/kM
समिति/(PQ
कारिणी/^(
मौसम/fE
पूर्वलिखित/=
मोदन/+@
सामान/fE
मंथरित/!
संपत्ति/`=
मंज़िला/nG
हीनवर्ण/m
बोधकता/&
बोधक/(@%
पुष्टित/)
वादक/@M
मुआफ़िक/j
घर-बार/f
व्याप्ति/=&!
शास्ता/@
विज्ञान/`_E
ज्ञान/=+e%(m@
निवृत्तात्मा/=
कोगी/k
लिप्सु/&+
सूचना/+JK
ज़ुबान/f
मलयुक्त/_
रामराम/m
वितंडा/&CI
ग़ुजर/k
बीजाणु/n
हरा/h734sTv
कर/~&$sT
विद/=&
नीता/e=+m
मानन/@DF
साना/kh
दिन/h@=%$
मानी/=fmi@
नामी/=dfi
दाना/fIC
दिया/jg
नुमा/=d
बान/kME
कार्यों/=
द/jvLEDM
ई/ljg+
सन/k=+EF
पन/kFE
नत/+sT
तत/!m
कन/k=F
ईन/j+
कर्ताओं/(
सिन/fi+
साओ/k
साए/k=
पिए/j
नें/i+
नति/m=+
काओ/k
सूचक/&(~@$
सा/nkjgfh=+
वी/kjg=+
वाँ/g=+
कना/kjh=
पूँगा/j
कों/kj+
देंगी/j
कर्ता/~=%$(m@
का/k34sTvAGBCI
दों/jg=&
स्पर्धात्मक/%
गदला/j
भव्यता/!=
स्फारित/m
गोतिया/=
तराश/j
मदार/j
चिन्ता/$@!=
मानवी/=+!
भोजिता/!
ब्याजी/!=
क़ाफ़ी/j
चरणहीन/+
भौतिकी/!`
रूप/%=@sT
कारिता/(
मरम्मत/fE
पति/n=^&
त्र/njM
दाम/gMFE
साँ/n+
यातायात/`
साज़ो/gf
वक़्त/gfi
कर्ज़/f
नंगो/f
पनाह/f
सत्ताक/n
नज़ीर/f
शक्ल/fi
कर्मिणी/^
गोलीय/`
शंकालु/^sT
सूत्री/n
स्पंद/_m
चर्चित/e=
वृद्वि/!
हाइड्राइड/l
माँबाप/f
द्योतित/&
लंघक/!m
राजस्व/`
वर्गीकरण/m
तृण/`
व्यापी/!=
कामनाएओँ/$
सर्वांगीणता/=
श्रमहीन/+
चारी/=+^njf!m@%
लोभ/m@=+%&
वादित/%m@
विवाद/&M
बरा/h734sTv
बर/g=EFM
स्खलन/`
धमित/m
लुठिंत/`
जिंस/i
राजकर/m
गीला/h
मकतब/i
बर्ग/i
स्रक/m
भौतिकविज्ञान/`M
मज़हब/i
बर्ट/h
मसरा/h
यायी/@
हारी/=+^fm@%
ज़बाँ/i
क्लोजर/l
पिधानन/=
नैना/e
क्रम-सूची/(
निष्कृति/^
क्लोज़िंग/l
साख़्ता/f
ग्रहक/m
किल्विषी/&
मर्दानगी/j
भेदनीय/=
मृत्यु/=+
धृषित/m
स्वानिक/n=
सिद्धिप्राप्त/(
लुण्ठित/`
जुल्फ/i
वर्तिष्णु/m
पल्ला/i
भारग्रहण/(
स्फुल/m
वंश/h@=
सत्यवादिता/=
कामनापूर्ण/$
ताति/$
लिज्जत/+
न्यु/$
हारण/%
मानचित्रित/=
वातोर्मि/%@
शोथ/_
कार्न/^
धनाढ्‌य/!
कौर्न/^
पर्यस्त/m
सन्धान/@
सम्पत्ति/`
पत्नीत्व/n
निरति/^
ज़ुल्फ़/i
श्रमस्थान/+
प्रजातंत्रात्मक/=
चोबा/nIC
वादग्रस्त/m
त्व/$nM
नामोनिशाँ/f
पाटला/nCI
लिंग/n+=E
वर्षी/n
योगियों/%
मुलायजा/g
